District of Columbia statutes.
28:2-701

Remedies for breach of collateral contracts not impaired.

Remedies for breach of any obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to a contract for sale are not impaired by the provisions of this article.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 664, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28:2-701.
1973 Ed., § 28:2-701.

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: None.

Purposes: Whether a claim for breach of an obligation collateral to the contract for sale requires separate trial to avoid confusion of issues is beyond the scope of this Article; but contractual arrangements which as a business matter enter vitally into the contract should be considered a part thereof in so far as cross-claims or defenses are concerned.

Definitional Cross References: “Contract for sale”. Section 2-106.

“Remedy”. Section 1-201.